dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 0 יץ .
SFX 1074 Y 1
SFX 1074 0 יק .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 יר .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 יש .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 0 ית .
SFX 3282 Y 1
SFX 3282 0 ילותייך .
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 0 תקו .
SFX 4599 Y 1
SFX 4599 0 תקי .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 יניות .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 ופיה .
SFX 3022 Y 1
SFX 3022 0 ופיו .
SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 0 תתנו .
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 0 ופיי .
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 0 ופיך .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 תתני .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 ופים .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 מותיכם .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 מותיכן .
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 0 לייך .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 ליים .
SFX 3771 Y 1
SFX 3771 0 יחתכם .
SFX 3770 Y 1
SFX 3770 0 יחתכן .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 אותיהם .
SFX 1174 Y 1
SFX 1174 0 אותיהן .
SFX 4591 Y 1
SFX 4591 0 בלים .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 יתוה .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 יתוך .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 יתום .
SFX 2037 Y 1
SFX 2037 0 יתון .
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 0 צצו .
SFX 4628 Y 1
SFX 4628 0 צצי .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 ירייך .
SFX 2102 Y 1
SFX 2102 0 יטינו .
SFX 3475 Y 1
SFX 3475 0 יטיני .
SFX 3889 Y 1
SFX 3889 0 צותה .
SFX 3453 Y 1
SFX 3453 0 ישוהו .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 צותו .
SFX 3603 Y 1
SFX 3603 0 צותי .
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 0 צותך .
SFX 3602 Y 1
SFX 3602 0 צותם .
SFX 3601 Y 1
SFX 3601 0 צותן .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 וליהם .
SFX 1856 Y 1
SFX 1856 0 וליהן .
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 0 זכם .
SFX 1915 Y 1
SFX 1915 0 זכן .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 רותינו .
SFX 4171 Y 1
SFX 4171 0 איתכם .
SFX 4170 Y 1
SFX 4170 0 איתכן .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 בתנו .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 0 בתני .
SFX 1922 Y 1
SFX 1922 0 ויה .
SFX 2342 Y 1
SFX 2342 0 ויו .
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 0 ויי .
SFX 2340 Y 1
SFX 2340 0 ויך .
SFX 1492 Y 1
SFX 1492 0 וים .
SFX 2048 Y 1
SFX 2048 0 וין .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 וית .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 ידיה .
SFX 3782 Y 1
SFX 3782 0 ידיו .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 ידיי .
SFX 3780 Y 1
SFX 3780 0 ידיך .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 ידים .
SFX 2987 Y 1
SFX 2987 0 ידין .
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 0 א .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 ב .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 ג .
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 ד .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 ה .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 ו .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 ז .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 0 ח .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 ט .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 י .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 ך .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 0 כ .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 ל .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 ם .
SFX 2454 Y 1
SFX 2454 0 מ .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 ן .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 ס .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 ע .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 ף .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 ץ .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 ק .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 ר .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 ש .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 ת .
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 0 וגנו .
SFX 2504 Y 1
SFX 2504 0 יבוה .
SFX 2502 Y 1
SFX 2502 0 יבוך .
SFX 2501 Y 1
SFX 2501 0 יבום .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 יבון .
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 0 יבות .
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 0 עתוה .
SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 0 עתוך .
SFX 4674 Y 1
SFX 4674 0 עתום .
SFX 4673 Y 1
SFX 4673 0 עתון .
SFX 4124 Y 1
SFX 4124 0 דתיהו .
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 0 טטי .
SFX 4620 Y 1
SFX 4620 0 רב .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 רג .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 רה .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 רו .
SFX 3075 Y 1
SFX 3075 0 רט .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 רי .
SFX 209 Y 1
SFX 209 0 רך .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 רם .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 רן .
SFX 3073 Y 1
SFX 3073 0 רק .
SFX 1473 Y 1
SFX 1473 0 רר .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 רש .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 רת .
SFX 4206 Y 1
SFX 4206 0 קתיכם .
SFX 4205 Y 1
SFX 4205 0 קתיכן .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 חותיהם .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 חותיהן .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 רויותינו .
SFX 1548 Y 1
SFX 1548 0 ריהו .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 ריהם .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 ריהן .
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 0 טיכם .
SFX 1033 Y 1
SFX 1033 0 טיכן .
SFX 3135 Y 1
SFX 3135 0 יפיכם .
SFX 3134 Y 1
SFX 3134 0 יפיכן .
SFX 3785 Y 1
SFX 3785 0 ידותינו .
SFX 2272 Y 1
SFX 2272 0 ציות .
SFX 1717 Y 1
SFX 1717 0 סותייך .
SFX 1859 Y 1
SFX 1859 0 דונו .
SFX 1858 Y 1
SFX 1858 0 דוני .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 יככם .
SFX 1071 Y 1
SFX 1071 0 שותיה .
SFX 1068 Y 1
SFX 1068 0 שותיו .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 יככן .
SFX 1067 Y 1
SFX 1067 0 שותיי .
SFX 1065 Y 1
SFX 1065 0 שותיך .
SFX 3634 Y 1
SFX 3634 0 פויותיה .
SFX 3631 Y 1
SFX 3631 0 פויותיו .
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 0 פויותיי .
SFX 3628 Y 1
SFX 3628 0 פויותיך .
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 ליה .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 ליו .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 ליי .
SFX 566 Y 1
SFX 566 0 ליך .
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 0 לים .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 0 לין .
SFX 4504 Y 1
SFX 4504 0 טנוכם .
SFX 4503 Y 1
SFX 4503 0 טנוכן .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 לית .
SFX 4092 Y 1
SFX 4092 0 ודכם .
SFX 4091 Y 1
SFX 4091 0 ודכן .
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 0 זתה .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 זתו .
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 0 זתי .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 0 זתך .
SFX 1840 Y 1
SFX 1840 0 זתם .
SFX 1839 Y 1
SFX 1839 0 זתן .
SFX 1891 Y 1
SFX 1891 0 דוה .
SFX 1889 Y 1
SFX 1889 0 דוך .
SFX 1888 Y 1
SFX 1888 0 דום .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 0 דון .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 דות .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 ענוכם .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 ענוכן .
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 0 גה .
SFX 626 Y 1
SFX 626 0 גו .
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 0 גי .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 גך .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 גל .
SFX 746 Y 1
SFX 746 0 גם .
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 0 גן .
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 0 גע .
SFX 1762 Y 1
SFX 1762 0 גר .
SFX 3347 Y 1
SFX 3347 0 גש .
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 0 גת .
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 וינה .
SFX 1313 Y 1
SFX 1313 0 ורה .
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 0 וינו .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 ורו .
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 0 צוהו .
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 0 ורי .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 ורך .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 0 ורם .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 ורן .
SFX 3006 Y 1
SFX 3006 0 ורת .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 ירנה .
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 0 ירנו .
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 0 ירני .
SFX 3747 Y 1
SFX 3747 0 יעוכם .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 יעוכן .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 ריותיכם .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 ריותיכן .
SFX 4593 Y 1
SFX 4593 0 בבנה .
SFX 3557 Y 1
SFX 3557 0 בבו .
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 0 בותינו .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 חויות .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 מותיהם .
SFX 790 Y 1
SFX 790 0 מותיהן .
SFX 4515 Y 1
SFX 4515 0 חזר .
SFX 3761 Y 1
SFX 3761 0 יטייך .
SFX 3378 Y 1
SFX 3378 ץ צרת ץ
SFX 2253 Y 1
SFX 2253 ח ילם ח
SFX 4837 Y 1
SFX 4837 ח יפך ח
SFX 3434 Y 1
SFX 3434 ם ממת ם
SFX 4722 Y 1
SFX 4722 ם נחן ם
SFX 4275 Y 1
SFX 4275 ם נקי ם
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 ם נקו ם
SFX 3242 Y 1
SFX 3242 ם מרתן ם
SFX 2349 Y 1
SFX 2349 ץ צותנו ץ
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 ן נויות ן
SFX 4703 Y 1
SFX 4703 ן נקם ן
SFX 3925 Y 1
SFX 3925 ן נקו ן
SFX 2355 Y 1
SFX 2355 ץ צותו ץ
SFX 1383 Y 1
SFX 1383 ר שר ר
SFX 2852 Y 1
SFX 2852 ה וליו ה
SFX 2600 Y 1
SFX 2600 ה וליי ה
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 ב ירם ב
SFX 4777 Y 1
SFX 4777 ך כנותנו ך
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 ם מוניהן ם
SFX 4388 Y 1
SFX 4388 ד יק ד
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 ד ירם ד
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 ו חמו ו
SFX 3716 Y 1
SFX 3716 ה ירם ה
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 ף פתך ף
SFX 4810 Y 1
SFX 4810 ו ירם ו
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 ד ידים ד
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 ו יק ו
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 ף פתינו ף
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 ט יטן ט
SFX 4318 Y 1
SFX 4318 ל מדנו ל
SFX 3715 Y 1
SFX 3715 ח ירם ח
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 ד ידוני ד
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 ח יק ח
SFX 4368 Y 1
SFX 4368 ט ירם ט
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 ם מדנו ם
SFX 2457 Y 1
SFX 2457 ך כתיכן ך
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 ח ידים ח
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 ם מיותינו ם
SFX 1023 Y 1
SFX 1023 ך כיו ך
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 ך כיי ך
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 ח ידוני ח
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 ץ צייך ץ
SFX 3812 Y 1
SFX 3812 ב וש ב
SFX 4849 Y 1
SFX 4849 ב ימכן ב
SFX 4329 Y 1
SFX 4329 ך כרות ך
SFX 1536 Y 1
SFX 1536 ך כותיו ך
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 ך כותיי ך
SFX 4943 Y 1
SFX 4943 ה ושן ה
SFX 4264 Y 1
SFX 4264 ן סר ן
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 ה וננו ה
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 ה וש ה
SFX 3496 Y 1
SFX 3496 ד ידון ד
SFX 4512 Y 1
SFX 4512 ו חתו ו
SFX 939 Y 1
SFX 939 ף פוהו ף
SFX 4833 Y 1
SFX 4833 ח יפן ח
SFX 4876 Y 1
SFX 4876 ח יליה ח
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 ח ימכן ח
SFX 4911 Y 1
SFX 4911 ח ידון ח
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 ם מצנה ם
SFX 2761 Y 1
SFX 2761 ץ צויותינו ץ
SFX 1361 Y 1
SFX 1361 ף פויותייך ף
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 ן ננתי ן
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 ן ננתם ן
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 ן רום ן
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 ב ובכן ב
SFX 3216 Y 1
SFX 3216 ר שש ר
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 ץ צותך ץ
